Utah statutes.
20A-3-502.   Intimidation -- Undue influence.

(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, by himself or by any other person on his behalf, to make use of any force, violence, or restraint, or to inflict or threaten the infliction of, by himself or through any other person, any injury, damage, harm or loss, or in any manner to practice intimidation upon or against any person in order to induce or compel that person to:

(i)  vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election provided by law; or

(ii)  vote or refrain from voting at any election.

(b)  It is unlawful for any person by abduction or duress, or any forcible or fraudulent device or contrivance whatever, to impede, prevent, or otherwise interfere with the free exercise of the elective franchise of any voter, either in giving or refraining from giving his vote at any election, or in giving or refraining from giving his vote for any particular person at any election.

(c)  It is unlawful for any employer, corporation, association, company, firm, or person to:

(i)  enclose their employees' salary or wages in envelopes on which there is written or printed any political mottoes, devices, or arguments containing threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinion, views, or action of the employees; or

(ii)  within 90 days of any election provided by law to put up, or otherwise exhibit, in its, their, or his factory, workshop, mine, mill, boarding house, office, or other establishment or place where employees may be working or be present in the course of employment, any handbill, notice, or placard containing any threat, notice, or information, that if any particular ticket or candidate is or is not elected:

(A)  work in the establishment will cease in whole or in part;

(B)  the establishment will be closed;

(C)  wages of workmen be reduced; or

(D)  other threats, express or implied, intended or calculated to influence the political opinions or actions of employees.

(2)  Any person, whether acting in his individual capacity or as an officer or agent of any corporation, who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

